Virginia statutes. Title 4.1. Alcoholic Beverage and Cannabis Control.
Article 2. Licenses Granted by Board; Limitations; Revocation and Suspension.
Banquet facility licenses to volunteer fire departments and volunteer emergency medical services agencies, which shall authorize the licensee to permit the consumption of lawfully acquired alcoholic beverages on the premises of the licensee by any person, and bona fide members and guests thereof, otherwise eligible for a banquet license. However, lawfully acquired alcoholic beverages shall not be purchased or sold by the licensee or sold or charged for in any way by the person permitted to use the premises. Such premises shall be a volunteer fire or volunteer emergency medical services agency station or both, regularly occupied as such and recognized by the governing body of the county, city, or town in which it is located. Under conditions as specified by Board regulation, such premises may be other than a volunteer fire or volunteer emergency medical services agency station, provided such other premises are occupied and under the control of the volunteer fire department or volunteer emergency medical services agency while the privileges of its license are being exercised.

Designated outdoor refreshment area licenses to a locality, business improvement district, or nonprofit organization, which shall authorize (i) the licensee to permit the consumption of alcoholic beverages within the area designated by the Board for the designated outdoor refreshment area and (ii) any permanent retail on-premises licensee that is located within the area designated by the Board for the designated outdoor refreshment area to sell alcoholic beverages within the permanent retail location for consumption in the area designated for the designated outdoor refreshment area, including sidewalks and the premises of businesses not licensed to sell alcoholic beverages at retail, upon approval of such businesses. In determining the designated area for the designated outdoor refreshment area, the Board shall consult with the locality. Designated outdoor refreshment area licensees shall be limited to 16 events per year, and the duration of any event shall not exceed three consecutive days. However, the Board may increase the frequency and duration of events after adoption of an ordinance by a locality requesting such increase in frequency and duration. Such ordinance shall include the size and scope of the area within which such events will be held, a public safety plan, and any other considerations deemed necessary by the Board. Such limitations on the number of events that may be held shall not apply during the effective dates of any rule, regulation, or order that is issued by the Governor or State Health Commissioner to meet a public health emergency and that effectively reduces allowable restaurant seating capacity; however, designated outdoor refreshment area licensees shall be subject to all other applicable provisions of this subtitle and Board regulations and shall provide notice to the Board regarding the days and times during which the privileges of the license will be exercised. Only alcoholic beverages purchased from permanent retail on-premises licensees located within the designated area may be consumed at the event, and such alcoholic beverages shall be contained in paper, plastic, or similar disposable containers that clearly display the name or logo of the retail on-premises licensee from which the alcoholic beverage was purchased. Alcoholic beverages shall not be sold or charged for in any way by the designated outdoor refreshment area licensee. The designated outdoor refreshment area licensee shall post appropriate signage clearly demarcating for the public the boundaries of the event; however, no physical barriers shall be required for this purpose. The designated outdoor refreshment area licensee shall provide adequate security for the event to ensure compliance with the applicable provisions of this subtitle and Board regulations.

Annual mixed beverage banquet licenses to duly organized private nonprofit fraternal, patriotic, or charitable membership organizations that are exempt from state and federal taxation and in charge of banquets conducted exclusively for members and their guests, which shall authorize the licensee to serve mixed beverages for on-premises consumption in areas approved by the Board on the premises of the place designated in the license. Such license shall authorize the licensee to conduct no more than 12 banquets per calendar year. The granting of a license pursuant to this subdivision shall automatically authorize the licensee to obtain a license to sell and serve wine and beer for on-premises consumption; however, the licensee shall be required to pay the local fee required for such additional license pursuant to §

4.1-233.1

.

Equine sporting event licenses, which may be issued to organizations holding equestrian, hunt, and steeplechase events, which shall authorize the licensee to permit the consumption of lawfully acquired alcoholic beverages on the premises of the licensee by patrons thereof during such event. However, alcoholic beverages shall not be sold or charged for in any way by the licensee. The privileges of this license shall be (i) limited to the premises of the licensee, regularly occupied and utilized for equestrian, hunt, and steeplechase events, and (ii) exercised on no more than four calendar days per year.

Annual arts venue event licenses, to persons operating an arts venue, which shall authorize the licensee participating in a community art walk that is open to the public to serve lawfully acquired wine or beer on the premises of the licensee to adult patrons thereof during such events. However, alcoholic beverages shall not be sold or charged for in any way, directly or indirectly, by the licensee, and the licensee shall not give more than two five-ounce glasses of wine or two 12-ounce glasses of beer to any one adult patron. The privileges of this license shall be (i) limited to the premises of the arts venue regularly occupied and used as such and (ii) exercised on no more than 12 calendar days per year.

The Board may grant a marketplace license to persons operating a business enterprise of which the primary function is not the sale of alcoholic beverages, which shall authorize the licensee to serve complimentary wine or beer to bona fide customers on the licensed premises subject to any limitations imposed by the Board; however, the licensee shall not give more than two five-ounce glasses of wine or two 12-ounce glasses of beer to any customer per day, nor shall it sell or otherwise charge a fee to such customer for the wine or beer served or consumed. In order to be eligible for and retain a marketplace license, the applicant’s business enterprise must (i) provide a single category of goods or services in a manner intended to create a personalized experience for the customer; (ii) employ staff with expertise in such goods or services; (iii) be ineligible for any other license granted by the Board; (iv) have an alcoholic beverage control manager on the licensed premises at all times alcohol is served; (v) ensure that all employees satisfy any training requirements imposed by the Board; and (vi) purchase all wine and beer to be served from a licensed wholesaler or the Authority and retain purchase records as prescribed by the Board. In determining whether to grant a marketplace license, the Board shall consider (a) the average amount of time customers spend at the business; (b) the business’s hours of operation; (c) the amount of time that the business has been in operation; and (d) any other requirements deemed necessary by the Board to protect the public health, safety, and welfare.

The Board may grant the following shipper, bottler, and related licenses:

Wine and beer shipper licenses, which shall carry the privileges and limitations set forth in §

4.1-209.1

.

Internet wine and beer retailer licenses, which shall authorize persons located within or outside the Commonwealth to sell and ship wine and beer, in accordance with §

4.1-209.1

and Board regulations, in closed containers to persons in the Commonwealth to whom wine and beer may be lawfully sold for off-premises consumption. Such licensee shall not be required to comply with the monthly food sale requirement established by Board regulations.

Bottler licenses, which shall authorize the licensee to acquire and receive deliveries and shipments of beer in closed containers and to bottle, sell, and deliver or ship it, in accordance with Board regulations to (i) wholesale beer licensees for the purpose of resale, (ii) owners of boats registered under the laws of the United States sailing for ports of call of a foreign country or another state, and (iii) persons outside the Commonwealth for resale outside the Commonwealth.

Fulfillment warehouse licenses, which shall authorize associations as defined in §

13.1-313

with a place of business located in the Commonwealth to (i) receive deliveries and shipments of wine or beer owned by holders of wine and beer shipper’s licenses; (ii) store such wine or beer on behalf of the owner; and (iii) pick, pack, and ship such wine or beer as directed by the owner, all in accordance with Board regulations. No wholesale wine or wholesale beer licensee, whether licensed in the Commonwealth or not, or any person under common control of such licensee, shall acquire or hold any financial interest, direct or indirect, in the business for which any fulfillment warehouse license is issued.

Marketing portal licenses, which shall authorize agricultural cooperative associations organized under the provisions of the Agricultural Cooperative Association Act (§

13.1-312

et seq.), with a place of business located in the Commonwealth, in accordance with Board regulations, to solicit and receive orders for wine or beer through the use of the Internet from persons in the Commonwealth to whom wine or beer may be lawfully sold, on behalf of holders of wine and beer shipper’s licenses. Upon receipt of an order for wine or beer, the licensee shall forward it to a holder of a wine and beer shipper’s license for fulfillment. Marketing portal licensees may also accept payment on behalf of the shipper.

Third-party delivery licenses, which shall carry the privileges and limitations set forth in §

4.1-212.2

.

History.

2020, cc. 15, 16, 32, 34, 400, 1009, 1113, 1114, 1179; 2020, Sp. Sess. I, c. 34; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 1822021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 281, 282; , 3902022, cc. 78, 79, 589, 5902021, cc. 182, 3902022, cc. 78, 79, 589, 590.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 281 and
282, cl. 2, as amended by Acts
2022, cc. 78 and
79, cl. 2 provides: ‘‘That the provisions of this act shall expire on July 1, 2024.’’

Acts
2022, cc. 589 and
590, cl. 2 provides: “That any mixed beverage restaurant licensee that is located on the premises of and operated by a casino gaming establishment owned by an operator licensed under Article 3 ( §

58.1-4108

et seq.) of Chapter 41 of Title 58.1 of the Code of Virginia and holds a valid mixed beverage restaurant license granted by the Board of Directors of the Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Authority prior to July 1, 2022, shall be allowed to operate with the privileges of a mixed beverage casino license as set forth in
§

4.1-206.3

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, and any regulations promulgated pursuant thereto until July 1, 2023, or until the casino gaming establishment at which the restaurant is located is issued a mixed beverage casino license, whichever comes first.”